Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 318.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 318.1. A. Any person who drills or operates any well
for the exploration, development or production of oil or gas, or as
an injection or disposal well, within this state, shall furnish in
writing, on forms approved by the Corporation Commission, his or her
agreement to drill, operate and plug wells in compliance with the
rules of the Commission and the laws of this state, together with
evidence of financial ability to comply with the requirements for
plugging, closure of surface impoundments, removal of trash and
equipment as established by the rules of the Commission and by law.
To establish evidence of financial ability, the Commission shall
require:
1. Category A surety which shall include a financial statement
listing assets and liabilities and including a general release that
the information may be verified with banks and other financial
institutions. The statement shall prove a net worth of not less

than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). Category A surety will no
longer be accepted as valid form of surety for new operators to
select beginning November 1, 2025. All current operators who have
valid Category A surety and are in good standing with the Commission
will be able to retain their Category A surety for the time they are
a valid operator in the State of Oklahoma; or
2. Category B surety which shall include an irrevocable
commercial letter of credit, cash, a cashier's check, a Certificate
of Deposit, Bank Joint Custody Receipt, other negotiable instrument,
or, a blanket surety bond. Except as provided in paragraph 3 1 of
subsection A B or subsection C of this section, amount of such
letter of credit, cash, cashier's check, certificate, bond, receipt
or other negotiable instrument shall be in the amount of Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) but may be set higher at the
discretion of the Director of the Oil and Gas Conservation Division
based on the number of wells that the person operates as follows:
a. for one to ten wells, Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00),
b. for eleven to fifty wells, Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00),
c. for fifty-one to one hundred wells, One Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), and
d. for more than one hundred wells, One Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00).
The Commission is authorized to determine the a higher amount of
Category B surety based upon the past performance of the operator
and its insiders and affiliates regarding compliance with the laws
of this state, and any rules promulgated thereto including but not
limited to the drilling, operation and plugging of wells, closure of
surface impoundments or removal of trash and equipment, provided
that such higher amount shall not exceed One Hundred Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($150,000.00). Any instrument shall constitute an
unconditional promise to pay and be in a form negotiable by the
Commission.
3. B. 1. The Commission upon certification by any operator
subject to Category B surety that its plugging liability statewide
is less than the twenty-five-thousand-dollar standard amount based
on the number of wells operated as specified in this section may
ENR. H. B. NO. 1369 Page 2

allow said operator to provide Category B type surety in an amount
less than the amount required Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00) by this section, but at least sufficient to cover the
estimated cost of all plugging, closure, and removal operations
currently the responsibility of that operator. The liability
certification referred to in this paragraph subsection shall take
the form of an affidavit from a licensed well plugger estimating the
costs of all plugging, closure, and removal operations of the
operator requesting such relief. This alternative amount shall be
modified upward upon the assumption of additional operations by such
operator, the maximum amount of Category B surety to be posted not
to exceed the twenty-five-thousand-dollar total unless as provided
previously One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00).
B. Operators of record as of June 7, 1989, who do not have any
outstanding contempt citations or fines and whose insiders or
affiliates have no outstanding contempt citations or fines may post
Category A surety.
2. New operators, operators who have outstanding fines or
contempt citations and operators whose insiders or affiliates have
outstanding contempt citations or fines as of June 7, 1989, shall be
required to post Category B surety. Operators who have posted
Category B surety and have operated under this type surety and have
no outstanding fines at the end of three (3) years may post Category
A surety.
3. Operators using Category A surety who are assessed a fine of
Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or more and who do not pay the fine
within the specified time shall be required to post a Category B
surety within thirty (30) days of notification by the Commission.
C. For good cause shown concerning pollution or improper
plugging of wells by the operator posting either Category A or B
surety or by an insider or affiliate of such operator, the
Commission, upon application of the Director of the Oil and Gas
Conservation Division, after notice and hearing, may require the
filing of additional Category B surety in an amount greater than
Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) but not to exceed One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) One Hundred Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($150,000.00).
D. If the Commission determines that a blanket surety bond is
required, the bond shall be conditioned on the fact that the
operator shall cause the wells to be plugged and abandoned surface
ENR. H. B. NO. 1369 Page 3

impoundments to be closed, and trash and equipment to be removed in
accordance with the laws of this state and the rules of the
Commission. Each bond shall be executed by a corporate surety
authorized to do business in this state and shall be renewed and
continued in effect until the conditions have been met or release of
the bond is authorized by the Commission.
E. The agreement provided for in subsection A of this section
shall provide that if the Commission determines that the person
furnishing the agreement has neglected, failed, or refused to plug
and abandon, or cause to be plugged and abandoned, or replug any
well or has neglected, failed or refused to close any surface
impoundment or removed or cause to be removed trash and equipment in
compliance with the rules of the Commission, then the person shall
forfeit from his or her bond, letter of credit or negotiable
instrument or shall pay to this state, through the Commission, for
deposit in the State Treasury, a sum equal to the cost of plugging
the well, closure of any surface impoundment or removal of trash and
equipment. The Commission may cause the remedial work to be done,
issuing a warrant in payment of the cost thereof drawn against the
monies accruing in the State Treasury from the forfeiture or
payment. Any monies accruing in the State Treasury by reason of a
determination that there has been a noncompliance with the
provisions of the agreement or the rules of the Commission, in
excess of the cost of remedial action ordered by the Commission,
shall be credited to the Oil and Gas Revolving Fund. The Commission
shall also recover any costs arising from litigation to enforce this
provision. Provided, before a person is required to forfeit or pay
any monies to the state pursuant to this section, the Commission
shall notify the person at his or her last-known address of the
determination of neglect, failure or refusal to plug or replug any
well, or close any surface impoundment or remove trash and equipment
and said person shall have ten (10) days from the date of
notification within which to commence remedial operations. Failure
to commence remedial operations shall result in forfeiture or
payment as provided in this subsection.
F. It shall be unlawful for any person to drill or operate any
oil or gas well subject to the provisions of this section, without
the evidence of financial ability required by this section. The
Commission shall shut in, without notice, hearing or order of the
Commission, the wells of any such person violating the provisions of
this subsection and such wells shall remain shut in for
noncompliance until the required evidence of Category B surety is
obtained and verified by the Commission.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1369 Page 4

G. If title to property or a well is transferred, the
transferee shall furnish the evidence of financial ability to plug
the well and close surface impoundments required by the provisions
of this section, prior to the transfer.
H. As used in this section:
1. "Affiliate" means an entity that owns twenty percent (20%)
or more of the operator, or an entity of which twenty percent (20%)
or more is owned by the operator; and
2. "Insider" means officer, director, or person in control of
the operator; general partners of or in the operator; general or
limited partnership in which the operator is a general partner;
spouse of an officer, director, or person in control of the
operator; spouse of a general partner of or in the operator;
corporation of which the operator is a director, officer, or person
in control; affiliate, or insider of an affiliate as if such
affiliate were the operator; or managing agent of the operator.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1369 Page 5

Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1369 Page 6